Mississippi statutes. Title 51. Waters, Water Resources, Water Districts, Drainage, and Flood Control
Chapter 39. Storm Water Management Districts
§ 51-39-35.
Authority of public agencies to assist in attaining objectives of this chapter.

For the purpose of attaining the objectives of this chapter, any public agency may, upon any terms as it may determine, do any of the following:

Lend, contribute, or donate money to any district or perform services for the benefit of the district;

Donate, sell, convey, transfer, lease or grant to any district, without the necessity of authorization at any election of qualified voters, any property of any kind, where otherwise not prohibited by law; and

Do any thing, whether or not specifically authorized in this section, not otherwise prohibited by law, that is necessary or convenient to aid and cooperate with any district in attaining the objectives of this chapter.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, ch. 597, § 18, eff from and after August 21, 2000 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965 to the amendment of this section).

§ 51-39-37.
Property and revenue of district exempt from taxation.

The property and revenue of the district shall be exempt from all state, county and municipal taxation.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, ch. 597, § 19, eff from and after August 21, 2000 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965 to the amendment of this section).

§ 51-39-39.
Filing of financial reports.

Within ninety (90) days after the close of each fiscal year, the board of commissioners shall publish in a newspaper of general circulation in the county a sworn statement showing the financial condition of the district. The statement shall also be filed with the governing body of each member of the district.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, ch. 597, § 20, eff from and after August 21, 2000 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965 to the amendment of this section).

§ 51-39-41.
District not authorized to deny access to system to person holding appropriate permits.

This chapter shall not be construed to authorize a district to deny access to the storm water management system or any portion of that system to any person holding a valid water pollution control permit or coverage under a general permit from the Environmental Quality Permit Board.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, ch. 597, § 21, eff from and after August 21, 2000 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965 to the amendment of this section).

§ 51-39-43.
Chapter constitutes full and complete authority for creation of district.

This chapter, without reference to any other statute, shall be deemed to be full and complete authority for the creation of a district. No proceedings shall be required for the creation of a district other than those provided for and required in this chapter. All the necessary powers to be exercised by the governing body of a county or municipality and by the board of commissioners of any district, in order to carry out this chapter, are hereby conferred.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, ch. 597, § 22, eff from and after August 21, 2000 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965 to the amendment of this section).